test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-27hapu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - hapu: # Adjective (27) hapu 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hapu+A+Sg+Nom: hapu
     hapu+A+Sg+Gen: hapnõ
     hapu+A+Sg+Par: hapund
     hapu+A+Sg+Ill: [hapnõhe, hapnõdõ]
     hapu+A+Sg+Ine: [hapnõn, hapnõh, hapnõhn]
     hapu+A+Sg+Ela: hapnõst
     hapu+A+Sg+All: hapnõlõ
     hapu+A+Sg+Ade: hapnõl
     hapu+A+Sg+Abl: hapnõlt
     hapu+A+Sg+Tra: hapnõs
     hapu+A+Sg+Ter: hapnõniq
     hapu+A+Sg+Abe: hapnõldaq
     hapu+A+Sg+Com: hapnõgaq
     hapu+A+Pl+Nom: hapnõq
     hapu+A+Pl+Gen: [hapnidõ, hapniidõ, hapundõ]
     hapu+A+Pl+Par: [hapnit, hapniid]
     hapu+A+Pl+Ill: [hapnihe, hapniihe, hapnidõ, hapniidõ, hapundõhe]
     hapu+A+Pl+Ine: [hapnin, hapniin, hapnih, hapniih, hapnihn, hapniihn, hapundõn, hapundõh, hapundõhn]
     hapu+A+Pl+Ela: [hapnist, hapniist, hapundõst]
     hapu+A+Pl+All: [hapnilõ, hapniilõ, hapundõlõ]
     hapu+A+Pl+Ade: [hapnil, hapniil, hapundõl]
     hapu+A+Pl+Abl: [hapnilt, hapniilt, hapundõlt]
     hapu+A+Pl+Tra: [hapnis, hapniis, hapundõs]
     hapu+A+Pl+Ter: [hapniniq, hapniiniq, hapundõniq]
     hapu+A+Pl+Abe: [hapnildaq, hapniildaq, hapundõldaq]
     hapu+A+Pl+Com: [hapnidõgaq, hapniidõgaq, hapundõgaq]
